North Dakota, session 69, SB2277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 24-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
North Dakota fallen peace officers memorial highway - State highway 200 - Continuing
appropriation.
1. The department shall designate state highway 200 from the Minnesota border to the Montana
border as the North Dakota fallen peace officers memorial highway and shall place signs
along the highway designating that name.
2. The department shall consult with the family and associates of North Dakota peace officers
and law enforcement officers, and handlers and owners of canine officers, killed in the line of
duty, to designate up to one mile of state highway 200 to memorialize an individual peace
officer, law enforcement officer, or canine officer.
3. The department may accept any appropriate signs or funds donated to the department for the
placement of signs. Any donated funds are appropriated to the department on a continuing
basis for the purpose of providing signs designating state highway 200 as the North Dakota
fallen peace officers memorial highway.

S. B. NO. 2277 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2277.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State